California statutes. Financial Code
No corporation shall deposit any of its funds with any other moneyed corporation unless the other corporation has been nominated and designated as a depositary for the funds of the depositing corporation by the vote of a majority of the directors of the depositing corporation and has been approved by the commissioner as a depositary. The commissioner may in his or her discretion revoke his or her approval of any such depositary. This limitation shall not apply to the deposit of funds by
 a corporation with another moneyed corporation, that owns all or a majority of the capital stock of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1868.

No corporation shall be the holder of any shares of its own capital stock unless such stock shall have been taken to prevent loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith, and stock so acquired shall, within six months from the time of its acquisition, be sold or disposed of at public or private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1869.

No corporation shall, either directly or indirectly, make any discount to any person for the purpose of enabling him to pay for or hold shares of its stock either subscribed for or purchased by him. Any corporation making any such discount shall forfeit to the people of the state twice the amount of such discount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1870.

No corporation shall by any system of accounting or any device of bookkeeping, directly or indirectly enter any of its assets upon its books in the name of any other person, or under any title or designation that is not truly descriptive thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.

Every corporation shall conform its methods of keeping its books and records to such orders in respect thereto as have been made and promulgated by the commissioner. Any corporation that refuses or neglects to obey such order shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day it so refuses or neglects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1872.

Each official communication directed by the commissioner to a corporation or to any officer thereof, relating to an examination or investigation conducted by the department or containing suggestions or recommendations as to the conduct of the business of such corporation, shall be submitted, by the officer receiving it, to the board at the next meeting of such board, and duly noted in the minutes of the meetings of such board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1873.

On or before the first day of February in each year, each corporation and every foreign corporation licensed by the commissioner to transact the business of such a corporation in this state, shall make a written report to the commissioner which shall contain a statement of its condition on the morning of the first day of January in that year and shall be in the form and contain the matters prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may, however, in his or her discretion, accept
 from a corporation, which has branches in a foreign country or countries, a report containing a statement of its condition as of a date not later than the first day of January and not earlier than the first day of November in the preceding year. Every report shall be verified by the oaths of the two principal officers in charge of the affairs of the corporation or foreign corporation at the time of the verification, which shall state that the report is true and correct in all respects to the best of the knowledge and belief of the persons verifying it, and that the usual business of the corporation or foreign corporation has been transacted at the location required by this article and not elsewhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1874.

Every corporation and foreign corporation shall also make such other special reports to the commissioner as he or she may from time to time require, which shall be in such form and filed at such date as may be prescribed by the commissioner and shall, if required by the commissioner, be verified in such manner as he or she may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.

If any corporation or foreign corporation shall fail to make any report required by this article on or before the day designated for the making thereof, or shall fail to include therein any matter required by the commissioner, it shall forfeit to the people of the state the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for every day that such report shall be delayed or withheld, and for every day that it shall fail to report any such omitted matter, unless the time therefor shall have been extended
 by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1876.

Every corporation shall hold a meeting of its stockholders annually upon a date fixed in its bylaws at its main office, or if its main office is to be located outside of this state, at its branch or other office in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.

Every corporation shall keep at its main office, or if its main office is to be located outside of this state, at its branch or other office in this state, books containing the names of all stockholders thereof, and the names and addresses of the members of its board of directors, together with copies of all reports made by it to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1878.

Every corporation shall make reports to the commissioner at such times and in such form as the commissioner may require and is subject to examination by examiners appointed by the commissioner, to the extent and whenever and as often as the commissioner shall deem it advisable, but in no case less than once every two calendar years. The cost of such examinations shall be fixed by the commissioner and be paid by the corporation examined.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.

No officer, director, clerk or other employee of any corporation, and no person in any way interested or concerned in the management of its affairs, shall as individuals discount, or directly or indirectly, make any loan upon any note or other evidence of debt, which he shall know to have been offered for discount to such corporation, and to have been refused. Every person violating the provisions of this section, shall, for each offense, forfeit to the people of the state twice the
 amount of the loan which he shall have made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.

Every officer, director, clerk, employee, or agent of any corporation who embezzles, abstracts, or willfully misapplies any of the moneys, funds, credits, securities, evidence of indebtedness or assets of any character of such corporation, or who, without authority from the directors, issues or puts forth any certificate of deposit, draws any order or bill of exchange, makes any acceptance, assigns any note, bond, debenture, draft, bill of exchange, mortgage, judgment, or decree, or who
 makes any false entry in any book, report, or statement of such corporation with intent, in either case, to injure or defraud such corporation or any other company, body politic or corporate, or any individual person, or to deceive any officer of such corporation, the commissioner, or any agent or examiner appointed to examine the affairs of any such corporation; and every receiver of any corporation and every clerk or employee of such receiver who shall embezzle, abstract, or willfully misapply or wrongfully convert to his or her own use any moneys, funds, credits, or assets of any character which may come into his or her possession or under his or her control in the execution of his or her trust or the performance of the duties of his or her employment; and every such receiver or clerk or employee of such receiver who shall, with intent to injure or defraud any person, body politic or corporate, or to deceive or mislead the commissioner or any agent or examiner appointed to examine the affairs of such
 receiver, shall make any false entry in any book, report, or record of any matter connected with the duties of such receiver; and every person who with like intent aids or abets any officer, director, clerk, employee, or agent of any corporation, or receiver or clerk or employee of such receiver as aforesaid in any violation of this article shall upon conviction thereof be imprisoned for two, three, or four years, and may also be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.

Whoever being connected in any capacity with any corporation represents in any way that the State of California is liable for the payment of any bond or other obligation, or the interest thereon, issued or incurred by any corporation, or that the State of California incurs any liability in respect of any act or omission of the corporation, shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 14.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.

No person shall act in this state as the representative of any foreign corporation in transacting the business described in this article as the business of a corporation unless such corporation shall have complied with the provisions of this article relating to such corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1883.

Every foreign corporation before being licensed by the commissioner to transact in this state the business of a corporation, or any part thereof, shall subscribe and acknowledge and submit to the commissioner at his or her office, an application certificate in duplicate, which shall specifically state:

(a) The name of such foreign corporation.

(b) The place
 where its business is to be transacted in this state.

(c) The amount of its capital stock actually paid in cash and the amount subscribed for and unpaid.

(d) A complete and detailed statement of its financial condition as of a date within 60 days prior to the date of such application certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1884.

At the time the application certificate is first submitted to the commissioner, such corporation shall also submit a duly authenticated copy of its charter, or articles, and its bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1885.

No foreign corporation shall transact in this state the business defined in this article or any part thereof, unless such corporation shall have:

(a) Been authorized by its charter to carry on such business and shall have complied with the laws of the state or country under which it is incorporated.

(b) Made the deposit with the State Treasurer required by
 this article.

(c) Designated the commissioner, by an instrument in writing duly executed, its true and lawful attorney upon whom all process in any action or proceeding by any resident of this state against it may be served with the same effect as if it were a domestic corporation and had been lawfully served with process within this state.

(d) Received a license duly issued to it by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1886.

When the commissioner shall have issued a license to any foreign corporation, it may engage in the business of a corporation of the kind authorized by this article at the location specified in the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1887.

Every foreign corporation, before receiving a license to transact business in this state, shall deposit with the State Treasurer of the State of California upon authorization of the commissioner, in trust as security for the depositors with and creditors of such corporation in this state, lawful money of the United States or securities of the kind and character described in Article 3 (commencing at Section 1570) of Chapter 16, of the value of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Such
 foreign corporation so long as it shall continue solvent and comply with the laws of this state, may be permitted by the commissioner to collect the interest on the securities so deposited and from time to time to exchange such securities for others, and examine and compare such securities, as provided by said article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1888.

The foreign corporation shall pay a license fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1889.

Every foreign corporation, duly licensed by the commissioner to transact in this state the business defined and authorized in this article, or any part thereof, shall within 30 days after the date of such license, submit to the commissioner a statement verified by two of its principal officers, which shall contain the full name and business address of every individual, partnership or unincorporated association, who is acting or whom it proposes to have act as its agent or representative
 in this state. Whenever any such corporation shall engage any person to act for it in this state and the name and address of such person is not contained in such verified statement submitted to the commissioner, such foreign corporation shall forthwith submit to the commissioner an amended statement verified in the same manner as the original. A violation of this provision shall subject such foreign corporation to a forfeiture of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1890.

Whenever the commissioner shall have revoked the license of any such foreign corporation and shall have taken the action to make such revocation effective, all the rights and privileges of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state shall forthwith cease and determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1891.

Nothing in this division restricts the right of a state international or foreign banking or financing corporation to convert into an international or foreign banking or financing corporation organized under the laws of the United States upon compliance with such laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1892.

An international or foreign banking or financing corporation organized under the laws of the United States may convert into a state international or foreign banking or financing corporation with the approval of the commissioner which he or she shall not grant unless he or she is satisfied that such international or foreign banking or financing corporation organized under the laws of the United States meets all of the requirements set forth in this article for the establishment of a state
 international or foreign banking or financing corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1893.

Nothing in this division restricts the right of any one or more state international or foreign banking or financing corporations to merge into or consolidate with one or more international or foreign banking or financing corporations organized under the laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1894.

Nothing in this division restricts one or more international or foreign banking or financing corporations organized under the laws of the United States from merging into one or more state, international or foreign banking or financing corporations. For the purpose of effecting any such merger any such international or foreign banking or financing corporation shall be deemed a “foreign corporation” as that term is used in Section 1108 of the Corporations Code and the laws of Congress
 shall be deemed the “laws of the state” in which such international or foreign banking or financing corporation is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1895.

Whenever a state international or foreign banking or financing corporation survives the merger of one or more international or foreign banking or financing corporations and the agreement for merger has been filed with the Secretary of State with the approval of the commissioner endorsed thereon, a copy thereof, certified by the Secretary of State, shall immediately be filed with the commissioner and upon, but not until, such filing the merger shall be and become effective for all
 purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1896.

Whenever one or more state international or foreign banking or financing corporations and one or more international or foreign banking or financing corporations organized under the laws of the United States have been merged or consolidated, the surviving or resulting international or foreign banking or financing corporation succeeds without other transfer to all the rights and property of each constituent international or foreign banking or financing corporation and is subject to all the
 debts and liabilities of each such constituent corporation in the same manner as if the surviving or resulting international or foreign banking or financing corporation had incurred them.

All rights of creditors of each constituent international or foreign banking or financing corporation are preserved unimpaired, limited in lien to the property affected by such liens immediately prior to the time of the consolidation or merger.

Any action or proceeding pending by or against any one of the constituent international or foreign banking or financing corporations may be prosecuted through judgment, which binds the resulting or surviving international or foreign banking or financing corporation; or such consolidated or surviving corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in the place of any such constituent corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1897.

Whenever an international or foreign banking or financing corporation organized under the laws of the United States converts into a state international or foreign banking or financing corporation, or whenever such state corporation converts into such corporation organized under the laws of the United States, or if any such state corporation merges or consolidates with any such corporation organized under the laws of the United States, the surviving or resulting corporation shall be
 deemed to be the same corporate entity as the converting or constituent corporation and any reference to the converting corporation or to any constituent corporation, whether executed or taking effect before or after the conversion, merger or consolidation, shall be deemed a reference to the surviving or resulting corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Bank Investments in International or Foreign Banking or Financing Companies Organized Under the Laws of the United States [1900. - 1902.]

1900.

Any bank may, with the consent of the commissioner, upon such conditions and under such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, invest in the stock of one or more corporations organized under the laws of the United States for the purpose of engaging in international or foreign banking or other international or foreign financial operations, or in banking or other financial operations in a dependency or insular possession of the United States, either directly or through the agency,
 ownership or control of local institutions in foreign countries, or in dependencies or insular possessions of the United States and to act when required by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States as fiscal agents of the United States; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of stock held in all corporations engaged in business of the kind described in this chapter shall not exceed 10 percent of the subscribing bank’s shareholders’ equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

Every bank investing in the capital stock of any corporation described in Section 1900 shall be required to furnish information concerning the condition of such corporation to the commissioner upon demand, and the commissioner may order special examinations of said corporation at such time or times as he or she may deem appropriate. The cost of such special examinations shall be paid by said corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

Before any bank shall be permitted to purchase stock in any corporation described in Section 1900 the said corporation shall enter into an agreement or undertaking with the commissioner to restrict its operations or conduct of its business in such manner or under such limitations and restrictions as the said commissioner may prescribe for the place or places wherein such business is to be conducted. If at any time the commissioner shall ascertain that the regulations prescribed by him or
 her are not being complied with, said commissioner is hereby authorized and shall have power to institute an investigation of the matter and to send for persons and papers, subpoena witnesses and administer oaths in order to satisfy himself or herself as to the actual nature of the transactions referred to. Should such investigation result in establishing the failure of the corporation in question, or any bank which may be a stockholder therein, to comply with the regulations laid down by the said commissioner, said bank may be required to dispose of its stockholding in the said corporation upon reasonable notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bank Investments in International or Foreign Banking or Financing Corporations Organized Under the Laws of any State of the United States [1905. - 1905.]

1905.

Any bank may, with the consent of the commissioner, upon such conditions and under such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, invest in the stock of one or more corporations organized under the laws of any state of the United States (other than a corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purposes of transacting business under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) and principally engaged in international or foreign banking, or banking in a
 dependency or insular possession of the United States either directly or through the agency, ownership, or control of local institutions in foreign countries, or in dependencies or insular possessions of the United States; provided, however, that the stock at the time of the acquisition would constitute a permissible investment for a national bank; and provided, further, that the aggregate amount of stock held in all corporations engaged in business of the kind described in this chapter shall not exceed 10 percent of the subscribing bank’s shareholders’ equity. Nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to limit the powers conferred by Section 1864.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bank Investments in Foreign Banks [1910. - 1910.]

1910.

Any bank may, with the consent of the commissioner, upon such conditions and under such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, acquire and hold, directly or indirectly, the stock or other evidences of ownership in one or more banks organized under the laws of a foreign country or a dependency or insular possession of the United States and not engaged, directly or indirectly, in any activity in the United States except as, in the judgment of the commissioner, shall be incidental
 to the international or foreign business of the bank. An application for consent shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may require, and be accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500). The aggregate amount invested by any bank in the stock or other evidences of ownership shall not in any way be subject to, or included in, the limitations prescribed in Sections 1864, 1900, and 1905, but the aggregate amount invested directly or indirectly (other than through a corporation organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of transacting business under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) or operating under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1900) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 1905) in the stock or other evidences of ownership of all foreign banks, taken together with investments by the subscribing bank in the shares of corporations organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of transacting business under Article 1 (commencing with Section
 1850) or operating under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1900) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 1905), shall not at any one time exceed 25 percent of the subscribing bank’s shareholders’ equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.2. MONEY TRANSMISSION ACT [2000. - 2176.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [2000. - 2003.]

2000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Money Transmission Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 2.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Money transmission businesses conduct a significant amount of business in this state and technological advances are occurring in the provision of money transmission services, which have expanded money transmission to include the use of mobile applications, alternative point of sale systems, and other consumer payment systems.

(b) Persons who use money transmission businesses in this state use those businesses for, among other purposes, paying for the necessities of life and transmitting money to family members.

(c) The failure of money transmission businesses
 to fulfill their obligations would cause loss to consumers, disrupt the payments mechanism in this state, undermine public confidence in financial institutions doing business in this state, and adversely affect the health, safety, and general welfare of persons in this state.

(d) To protect the interests of consumers of money transmission businesses in this state, to maintain public confidence in financial institutions doing business in this state, and to preserve the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state, it is necessary to regulate money transmission businesses in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this act accomplish all of the following:

(a) Protect the interests of persons in this state who use money transmission services.

(b) Provide for the safe and sound conduct of the business of licensees.

(c) Maintain public confidence in licensees.

(d) Ensure states can coordinate in all areas of regulation, licensing, and supervision to eliminate unnecessary regulatory burden and more effectively utilize regulator resources.

(e) Standardize the types of activities that are
 subject to licensing or exempt from licensing.

(f) Authorize the utilization of Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry forms, processes, and functionalities in accordance with this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2003.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Affiliate,” when used with respect to a specified person, means any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, that specified person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries. For purposes of subdivisions (s) and (x), a specified person is affiliated with another person if that person controls, is controlled by, or under common control through the ownership directly or indirectly of shares or equity securities possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power of that specified person.

(b) “Agent” means a person that is not itself licensed as a money transmitter in California and provides money transmission in California on behalf of the licensee,
 provided that the licensee becomes liable for the money transmission from the time money or monetary value is received by that person. However, “agent” does not include any officer or employee of the licensee when acting as such at an office of a licensee.

(c) “Applicant” means a person that files an application for a license or for acquisition of control of a licensee under this division.

(d) “Average daily outstanding” means the amount of outstanding money transmission obligations in California at the end of each day in a given period of time, added together, and divided by the total number of days in that period of time.

(e) “Branch office” means any office in this state of a licensee or agent at which the licensee receives money or monetary value to provide money transmission, either directly or through an
 agent.

(f) “Business day” means one of the following:

(1) When used with respect to any act to be performed in this state, any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or any other day that is provided for as a holiday in the Government Code.

(2) When used with respect to any act to be performed in any jurisdiction other than this state, any day other than a day that is a legal holiday under the laws of that jurisdiction.

(g) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(h) “Control” has the meaning set forth in Section 1250.

(i) “Day” means calendar day.

(j) “E-commerce” means any transaction where the payment for goods or services is initiated via a mobile application or an internet website.

(k) (1) “In California” or “in this state” means physically located in California.

(2) For a transaction requested electronically or by phone, the provider of money transmission may determine if the person requesting the transaction is in this state by relying on other information provided by the person regarding the location of the individual’s residential address or a business entity’s principal place of business or other physical address location and any records associated with the person that the provider of money transmission may have that indicate that location, including, but not limited to, an address associated with an account.

(l) “Issue” and “issuer” mean, with regard to a payment instrument, the entity that is the maker or drawer of the instrument in accordance with the California Commercial Code and is liable for payment. With regard to stored value, “issue” and “issuer” mean the entity that is liable to the holder of stored value and has undertaken or is obligated to pay the stored value. Only a licensee may issue stored value or payment instruments.

(m) “Key individual” means a natural person ultimately responsible for establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, including an executive officer, manager, director, or trustee.

(n) “Licensee” means a corporation or limited liability company licensed under this division.

(o) “Material litigation” means
 litigation that according to United States generally accepted accounting principles is significant to an applicant’s or a licensee’s financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the applicant’s or licensee’s annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records.

(p) “Monetary value” means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money.

(q) “Money” means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States or a foreign government. The term includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more governments.

(r) “Money transmission” means any of the following:

(1) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in
 this state.

(2) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this state.

(3) Receiving money for transmission from a person located in this state.

(s) “Multistate licensing process” means an agreement entered into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of applications for money transmission licenses, applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control determinations, or notice and information requirements for a change of key individuals.

(t) “NMLS” means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor
 or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries.

(u) “Outstanding,” with respect to payment instruments and stored value, means issued or sold by the licensee in the United States and not yet paid or refunded by the licensee, or issued or sold on behalf of the licensee in the United States by its agent and reported as sold, but not yet paid or refunded by the licensee. “Outstanding,” with respect to receiving money for transmission means all money or monetary value received in the United States for transmission by the licensee or its agents but not yet paid to the beneficiaries or refunded to the person from whom the money or monetary value was received. All outstanding money transmission of a licensee is and shall remain a liability of the licensee until it is no longer outstanding.

(v) (1) “Payment
 instrument” means a check, draft, money order, traveler’s check, or other instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value, whether or not negotiable.

(2) “Payment instrument” does not include any of the following:

(A) A credit card voucher or letter of credit.

 (B) An instrument that is redeemable by the issuer for goods or services provided by the issuer, an affiliate of the issuer, or a franchisee of the issuer.

 (C) An instrument that is not sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program.

(w) “Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, proprietorship, syndicate, limited
 liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation or joint stock company, or any other organization or legal or commercial entity, provided, however, that “person,” when used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specified person, includes any combination of two or more persons acting in concert.

(x) “Receiving money for transmission” or “money received for transmission” means receiving money or monetary value in the United States for transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or other means. The term does not include sale or issuance of payment instruments and stored value.

(y) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(z) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(aa) (1) “Stored value” means monetary value representing a claim against the issuer that is stored on an electronic or digital medium and evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or monetary value or payment for goods or services.

(2) “Stored value” does not include either of the following:

 (A) A credit card voucher, letter of credit, or any stored value that is redeemable only by the issuer for goods or services provided by the issuer, an
 affiliate of the issuer, or a franchisee of the issuer, except to the extent required by applicable law to be redeemable for cash for its cash value.

(B) Stored value not sold to the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program.

(bb) “Traveler’s check” means an instrument that meets all of the following:

(1) Is designated on its face by the term “traveler’s check” or by any substantially similar term or is commonly known and marketed as a traveler’s check.

(2) Contains a provision for a specimen signature of the purchaser to be completed at the time of purchase.

(3) Contains a provision for a countersignature of the purchaser to be completed at
 the time of negotiation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 2.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Exemptions [2010. - 2011.]

2010.

This division does not apply to any of the following:
